Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1 TRAFFIC REGULATION - GENERALLY
42-4-110.5. Automated vehicle identification systems - definition.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the enforcement of traffic laws through the use of automated vehicle identification systems under this section is a matter of statewide concern and is an area in which uniform state standards are necessary.

(1.5) Except for the authorization contained in subsection (1.7) of this section, nothing in this section shall apply to a violation detected by an automated vehicle identification device for driving twenty-five miles per hour or more in excess of the reasonable and prudent speed or twenty-five miles per hour or more in excess of the maximum speed limit of seventy-five miles per hour detected by the use of an automated vehicle identification device.

(1.7) (a) Upon request from the department of transportation, the department of public safety shall utilize an automated vehicle identification system to detect speeding violations under part 11 of this article within a highway maintenance, repair, or construction zone designated pursuant to section 42-4-614 (1)(a), if the department of public safety complies with subsections (2) to (6) of this section. An automated vehicle identification system shall not be used under this subsection (1.7) unless maintenance, repair, or construction is occurring at the time the system is being used. The department of public safety may contract with a vendor to implement this subsection (1.7). If the department of public safety contracts with a vendor, the contract shall incorporate the processing elements specified by the department of public safety. The department of public safety may contract with the vendor to notify violators, collect and remit the penalties and surcharges to the state treasury less the vendor's expenses, reconcile payments against outstanding violations, implement collection efforts, and notify the department of public safety of unpaid violations for possible referral to the judicial system. No penalty assessment or summons and complaint or a penalty or surcharge for a violation detected by an automated vehicle identification system under this subsection (1.7) shall be forwarded to the department for processing.

The department of transportation shall reimburse the department of public safety for the direct and indirect costs of complying with this subsection (1.7).

A municipality may adopt an ordinance authorizing the use of an automated vehicle identification system to detect violations of traffic regulations adopted by the municipality, or the state, a county, a city and county, or a municipality may utilize an automated vehicle identification system to detect traffic violations under state law, subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2002, p. 570

, § 1, effective May 24, 2002.)

If the state, a county, a city and county, or a municipality detects any alleged violation of a municipal traffic regulation or a traffic violation under state law through the use of an automated vehicle identification system, then the state, county, city and county, or municipality shall serve the penalty assessment notice or summons and complaint for the alleged violation on the defendant no later than ninety days after the alleged violation occurred. If a penalty assessment notice or summons and complaint for a violation detected using an automated vehicle identification system is personally served, the state, a county, a city and county, or a municipality may only charge the actual costs of service of process that shall be no more than the amount usually charged for civil service of process.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the statutes to the contrary, the state, a county, a city and county, or a municipality may not report to the department any conviction or entry of judgment against a defendant for violation of a municipal traffic regulation or a traffic violation under state law if the violation was detected through the use of an automated vehicle identification system.

The state, a county, a city and county, or a municipality may not report to the department any outstanding judgment or warrant for purposes of section

42-2-107 (5)

or

42-2-118 (3)

based upon any violation or alleged violation of a municipal traffic regulation or traffic violation under state law detected through the use of an automated vehicle identification system.

The state, a county, a city and county, or a municipality may not use an automated vehicle identification system to detect a violation of part 11 of this article or a local speed ordinance unless there is posted an appropriate temporary sign in a conspicuous place not fewer than three hundred feet before the area in which the automated vehicle identification device is to be used notifying the public that an automated vehicle identification device is in use immediately ahead. The requirement of this subparagraph (I) shall not be deemed satisfied by the posting of a permanent sign or signs at the borders of a county, city and county, or municipality, nor by the posting of a permanent sign in an area in which an automated vehicle identification device is to be used, but this subparagraph (I) shall not be deemed a prohibition against the posting of such permanent signs.

Except as provided in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d), an automated vehicle identification system designed to detect disobedience to a traffic control signal or another violation of this article or a local traffic ordinance shall not be used unless the state, county, city and county, or municipality using such system conspicuously posts a sign notifying the public that an automated vehicle identification device is in use immediately ahead. The sign shall:

Be placed in a conspicuous place not fewer than two hundred feet nor more than five hundred feet before the automated vehicle identification system; and

Use lettering that is at least four inches high for upper case letters and two and nine-tenths inches high for lower case letters.

The state, a county, a city and county, or a municipality may not require a registered owner of a vehicle to disclose the identity of a driver of the vehicle who is detected through the use of an automated vehicle identification system. However, the registered owner may be required to submit evidence that the owner was not the driver at the time of the alleged violation.

The state, a county, a city and county, or a municipality shall not issue a penalty assessment notice or summons for a violation detected using an automated vehicle identification system unless, at the time the violation is alleged to have occurred, an officer or employee of the state, the county, the city and county, or the municipality is present during the operation of the automated vehicle identification device; except that this paragraph (f) shall not apply to an automated vehicle identification system designed to detect violations for disobedience to a traffic control signal.

The state, a county, a city and county, or a municipality shall not issue a penalty assessment notice or summons for a violation detected using an automated vehicle identification system unless the violation occurred within a school zone, as defined in section

42-4-615

; within a residential neighborhood; within a maintenance, construction, or repair zone designated pursuant to section

42-4-614

; or along a street that borders a municipal park.

For purposes of this paragraph (g), unless the context otherwise requires, "residential neighborhood" means any block on which a majority of the improvements along both sides of the street are residential dwellings and the speed limit is thirty-five miles per hour or less.

This paragraph (g) shall not apply to an automated vehicle identification system designed to detect disobedience to a traffic control signal.

The department has no authority to assess any points against a license under section 42-2-127 upon entry of a conviction or judgment for a violation of a municipal traffic regulation or a traffic violation under state law if the violation was detected through the use of an automated vehicle identification system. The department may not keep any record of such violation in the official records maintained by the department under section 42-2-121.

If the state, a county, a city and county, or a municipality detects a speeding violation of less than ten miles per hour over the reasonable and prudent speed under a municipal traffic regulation or under state law through the use of an automated vehicle identification system and the violation is the first violation by such driver that the state, county, city and county, or municipality has detected using an automated vehicle identification system, then the state, county, city and county, or municipality shall mail such driver a warning regarding the violation and the state, county, city and county, or municipality may not impose any penalty or surcharge for such first violation.

If the state, a county, a city and county, or a municipality detects a second or subsequent speeding violation under a municipal traffic regulation or under state law by a driver, or a first such violation by the driver if the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) do not apply, through the use of an automated vehicle identification system, then, except as may be permitted in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b), the maximum penalty that the state, county, city and county, or municipality may impose for such violation, including any surcharge, is forty dollars.

If any violation described in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) occurs within a school zone, as defined in section 42-4-615, the maximum penalty that may be imposed shall be doubled.

Subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) shall not apply within a maintenance, construction, or repair zone designated pursuant to section 42-4-614.

(4.5) If the state, a county, a city and county, or a municipality detects a violation under a municipal traffic regulation or under state law for disobedience to a traffic control signal through the use of an automated vehicle identification system, the maximum penalty that the state, a county, a city and county, or a municipality may impose for such violation, including any surcharge, is seventy-five dollars.

(4.7) If a driver fails to pay a penalty imposed for a violation detected using an automated vehicle identification device, the state, a county, a city and county, or a municipality shall not attempt to enforce such a penalty by immobilizing the driver's vehicle.

If the state, a county, a city and county, or a municipality has established an automated vehicle identification system for the enforcement of municipal traffic regulations or state traffic laws, then no portion of any fine collected through the use of such system may be paid to the manufacturer or vendor of the automated vehicle identification system equipment. The compensation paid by the state, county, city and county, or municipality for such equipment shall be based upon the value of such equipment and may not be based upon the number of traffic citations issued or the revenue generated by such equipment.

As used in this section, the term "automated vehicle identification system" means a system whereby:

A machine is used to automatically detect a violation of a traffic regulation and simultaneously record a photograph of the vehicle, the operator of the vehicle, and the license plate of the vehicle; and

A penalty assessment notice or summons and complaint is issued to the registered owner of the motor vehicle.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1667, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 99:

(1.5) and (4.5) added and (2), (4), and (5) amended, p. 612, § 1, effective May 17.

L. 2002:

(2)(a), (2)(d), and (4.5) amended and (2)(f), (2)(g), and (4.7) added, pp. 570, 572, §§ 1, 2, effective May 24.

L. 2004:

(2)(d) amended, p. 351, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2008:

(1.5) and (2)(g)(I) amended and (1.7) and (4)(b)(III) added, pp. 2080, 2081, §§ 4, 5, effective June 3.

L. 2009:

(2)(d) amended, (SB 09-222), ch. 150, p. 629, § 1, effective August 5.

Cross references:

Section 1 of chapter 412, Session Laws of Colorado 2008, provides that the act amending subsections (1.5) and (2)(g)(I) and enacting subsections (1.7) and (4)(b)(III) shall be known and may be cited as the "Charles Mather Highway Safety Act".

42-4-111. Powers of local authorities.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, this article 4 does not prevent local authorities, with respect to streets and highways under their jurisdiction and within the reasonable exercise of the police power, from:

Regulating or prohibiting the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles, consistent with the provisions of this article;

Establishing parking meter zones where it is determined upon the basis of an engineering and traffic investigation that the installation and operation of parking meters is necessary to aid in the regulation and control of the parking of vehicles during the hours and on the days specified on parking meter signs;

Regulating traffic by means of police officers or official traffic control devices, consistent with the provisions of this article;

Regulating or prohibiting processions or assemblages on the highways, consistent with the provisions of this article;

Designating particular highways or roadways for use by traffic moving in one direction, consistent with the provisions of this article;

Designating any highway as a through highway or designating any intersection as a stop or yield intersection, consistent with the provisions of this article;

Designating truck routes and restricting the use of highways, consistent with the provisions of this article;

Regulating the operation of bicycles or electrical assisted bicycles and requiring the registration and licensing of same, including the requirement of a registration fee, consistent with the provisions of this article;

Altering or establishing speed limits, consistent with the provisions of this article;

Establishing speed limits for vehicles in public parks, consistent with the provisions of this article;

Determining and designating streets, parts of streets, or specific lanes thereon upon which vehicular traffic shall proceed in one direction during one period and the opposite direction during another period of the day, consistent with the provisions of this article;

Regulating or prohibiting the turning of vehicles, consistent with the provisions of this article;

Designating no-passing zones, consistent with the provisions of this article;

Prohibiting or regulating the use of controlled-access roadways by nonmotorized traffic or other kinds of traffic, consistent with the provisions of this article;

Establishing minimum speed limits, consistent with the provisions of this article;

Designating hazardous railroad crossings, consistent with the provisions of this article;

Designating and regulating traffic on play streets, consistent with the provisions of this article;

Prohibiting or restricting pedestrian crossing, consistent with the provisions of this article;

Regulating the movement of traffic at school crossings by official traffic control devices or by duly authorized school crossing guards, consistent with the provisions of this article;

Regulating persons propelling push carts;

Regulating persons upon skates, coasters, sleds, or similar devices, consistent with the provisions of this article;

Adopting such temporary or experimental regulations as may be necessary to cover emergencies or special conditions;

Adopting such other traffic regulations as are provided for by this article;

Closing a street or portion thereof temporarily and establishing appropriate detours or an alternative routing for the traffic affected, consistent with the provisions of this article;

Regulating the local movement of traffic or the use of local streets where such is not provided for in this article;

Regulating the operation of low-power scooters, consistent with the provisions of this article; except that local authorities shall be prohibited from establishing any requirements for the registration and licensing of low-power scooters;

Regulating the operation of low-speed electric vehicles, including, without limitation, establishing a safety inspection program, on streets and highways under their jurisdiction by resolution or ordinance of the governing body, if such regulation is consistent with the provisions of this title;

Authorizing and regulating the operation of golf cars on roadways by resolution or ordinance of the governing body, if the authorization or regulation is consistent with this title and does not authorize:

An unlicensed driver of a golf car to carry a passenger who is under twenty-one years of age;

Operation of a golf car by a person under sixteen years of age; or

Operation of a golf car on a state highway; except that the ordinance or resolution may authorize a person to drive a golf car directly across a state highway at an at-grade crossing to continue traveling along a roadway that is not a state highway;

Authorizing, prohibiting, or regulating the use of an EPAMD on a roadway, sidewalk, bike path, or pedestrian path consistent with section 42-4-117 (1) and (3);

Authorizing or prohibiting the use of an electrical assisted bicycle or electric scooter on a bike or pedestrian path in accordance with section 42-4-1412;

Enacting the idling standards in conformity with section 42-14-103;

Regulating the operation of an electric scooter, consistent with this title 42.

An ordinance or regulation enacted under paragraph (a), (b), (e), (f), (g), (i), (j), (k), (l), (m), (n), (o), (p), (q), (r), (v), (x), (y), (aa), or (cc) of subsection (1) of this section may not take effect until official signs or other traffic control devices conforming to standards as required by section 42-4-602 and giving notice of the local traffic regulations are placed upon or at the entrances to the highway or part thereof affected as may be most appropriate.

Subsection (1) of this section does not authorize a local authority to regulate or authorize the use of vehicles and motor vehicles on the state highway system that is subject to section 43-2-135, C.R.S., except in at-grade crossings where the roadway subject to the local authority's jurisdiction crosses the state highway. The local authority may regulate vehicles within such crossings only to the extent necessary to effect the local authority's power to regulate the roadway under the local authority's jurisdiction and only if the regulation or authorization does not interfere with the normal operation of the state highway.

A board of county commissioners may by resolution authorize the use of designated portions of unimproved county roads within the unincorporated portion of the county for motor vehicles participating in timed endurance events and for such purposes shall make such regulations relating to the use of such roads and the operation of vehicles as are consistent with public safety in the conduct of such event and with the cooperation of county law enforcement officials.

Such resolution by a board of county commissioners and regulations based thereon shall designate the specific route which may be used in such event, the time limitations imposed upon such use, any necessary restrictions in the use of such route by persons not participating in such event, special regulations concerning the operation of vehicles while participating in such event in which case any provisions of this article to the contrary shall not apply to such event, and such requirements concerning the sponsorship of any such event as may be reasonably necessary to assure adequate responsibility therefor.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2235, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(1)(aa) added and (2) amended, p. 394, §§ 8, 9, effective August 6.

L. 2009:

IP(1) and (1)(aa) amended and (1)(bb) added, (SB 09-075), ch. 418, p. 2323, § 7, effective August 5; IP(1), (1)(h), (1)(z), and (2) amended and (1)(cc) and (1)(dd) added, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1271, § 36, effective October 1.

L. 2011:

(1)(ee) added, (HB 11-1275), ch. 215, p. 942, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1)(bb)(II) amended, (SB 12-013), ch. 148, p. 533, § 2, effective May 3.

L. 2016:

IP(1), (1)(bb)(III), and (2) amended, (SB 16-173), ch. 273, p. 1131, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

IP(1) and (1)(dd) amended, (HB 17-1151), ch. 98, p. 296, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(1)(dd) amended and (1)(ff) added, (HB 19-1221), ch. 271, p. 2559, § 4, effective May 23.

42-4-112. Noninterference with the rights of owners of realty.

Subject to the exception provided in section 42-4-103 (2), nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent the owner of real property used by the public for purposes of vehicular travel by permission of the owner and not as matter of right from prohibiting such use, or from requiring other or different or additional conditions than those specified in this article, or from otherwise regulating such use as may seem best to such owner.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2237, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-110 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-112 was relocated to § 42-4-1211.

42-4-113. Appropriations for administration of article.

The general assembly shall make appropriations from the highway users tax fund for the expenses of the administration of this article.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2238, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-111 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-113 was relocated to § 42-4-1405.

42-4-114. Removal of traffic hazards.

The department of transportation and local authorities, within their respective jurisdictions, may by written notice sent by certified mail require the owner of real property abutting on the right-of-way of any highway, sidewalk, or other public way to trim or remove, at the expense of said property owner, any tree limb or any shrub, vine, hedge, or other plant which projects beyond the property line of such owner onto or over the public right-of-way and thereby obstructs the view of traffic, obscures any traffic control device, or otherwise constitutes a hazard to drivers or pedestrians.

It is the duty of the property owner to remove any dead, overhanging boughs of trees located on the premises of such property owner that endanger life or property on the public right-of-way.

In the event that any property owner fails or neglects to trim or remove any such tree limb or any such shrub, vine, hedge, or other plant within ten days after receipt of written notice from said department or concerned local authority to do so, said department or local authority may do or cause to be done the necessary work incident thereto, and said property owner shall reimburse the state or local authority for the cost of the work performed.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2238, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-4-115. Information on traffic law enforcement - collection - profiling - annual report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 933, § 1, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 2004. (See

L. 2001, p. 933

.)

42-4-116. Restrictions for minor drivers - definitions.

Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection (1), a minor driver shall not operate a motor vehicle containing a passenger who is under twenty-one years of age and who is not a member of the driver's immediate family until such driver has held a valid driver's license for at least six months.

Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection (1), a minor driver shall not operate a motor vehicle containing more than one passenger who is under twenty-one years of age and who is not a member of the driver's immediate family until such driver has held a valid driver's license for at least one year.

Paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (1) shall not apply if:

The motor vehicle contains the minor's parent or legal guardian or other responsible adult described in section 42-2-108;

The motor vehicle contains an adult twenty-one years of age or older who currently holds a valid driver's license and has held such license for at least one year;

The passenger who is under twenty-one years of age is in the vehicle on account of a medical emergency;

All passengers who are under twenty-one years of age are members of the driver's immediate family and all such passengers are wearing a seatbelt.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), a minor driver shall not operate a motor vehicle between 12 midnight and 5 a.m. until such driver has held a driver's license for at least one year.

This subsection (2) shall not apply if:

The motor vehicle contains the minor's parent or legal guardian or other responsible adult described in section 42-2-108;

The motor vehicle contains an adult twenty-one years of age or older who currently holds a valid driver's license and has held such license for at least one year;

The minor is driving to school or a school-authorized activity when the school does not provide adequate transportation, so long as the driver possesses a signed statement from the school official containing the date the activity will occur;

The minor is driving on account of employment when necessary, so long as the driver possesses a signed statement from the employer verifying employment;

The minor is driving on account of a medical emergency; or

The minor is an emancipated minor.

A violation of this section is a traffic infraction, and, upon conviction, the violator may be punished as follows:

By the imposition of not less than eight hours nor more than twenty-four hours of community service for a first offense and not less than sixteen hours nor more than forty hours of community service for a subsequent offense;

By the levying of a fine of not more than fifty dollars for a first offense, a fine of not more than one hundred dollars for a second offense, and a fine of one hundred fifty dollars for a subsequent offense;

By an assessment of two license suspension points pursuant to section 42-2-127 (5)(kk).

For the purposes of this section:

"Emancipated minor" means an individual under eighteen years of age whose parents or guardian has surrendered parental responsibilities, custody, and the right to the care and earnings of such person, and are no longer under a duty to support such person.

"Minor driver" means a person who is operating a motor vehicle and who is under eighteen years of age.

No driver in a motor vehicle shall be cited for a violation of this section unless such driver was stopped by a law enforcement officer for an alleged violation of articles 1 to 4 of this title other than a violation of this section.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 332, § 1, effective July 1.

42-4-117. Personal mobility devices.

A rider of an EPAMD shall have all the same rights and duties as an operator of any other vehicle under this article, except as to those provisions that by their nature have no application.

Unless prohibited under section 42-4-111 (1)(cc), an EPAMD may be operated on a roadway in conformity with vehicle use.

An EPAMD shall not be operated:

On a limited-access highway;

On a bike or pedestrian path; or

At a speed of greater than twelve and one-half miles per hour.

A person who violates this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1272, § 37, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the penalty for class B traffic infractions, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(I).

42-4-118. Establishment of wildlife crossing zones - report.

The department of transportation created in section 43-1-103, C.R.S., in consultation with both the Colorado state patrol created pursuant to section 24-33.5-201, C.R.S., and the division of parks and wildlife created pursuant to section 33-9-104, C.R.S., in the department of natural resources, may establish areas within the public highways of the state as wildlife crossing zones.

If the department of transportation establishes an area within a public highway of the state as a wildlife crossing zone, the department of transportation may erect signs:

Identifying the zone in accordance with the provisions of section 42-4-616; and

Establishing a lower speed limit for the portion of the highway that lies within the zone.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) to the contrary, the department of transportation shall not establish a lower speed limit for more than one hundred miles of the public highways of the state that have been established as wildlife crossing zones.

The department of transportation may establish an area within the federal highways of the state as a wildlife crossing zone if the department of transportation receives authorization from the federal government.

If the department of transportation establishes an area within the federal highways of the state as a wildlife crossing zone pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), the department of transportation may erect signs:

Identifying the zone in accordance with the provisions of section 42-4-616; and

Establishing a lower speed limit for the portion of the highway that lies within the zone.

If the department of transportation erects a new wildlife crossing zone sign pursuant to subsection (2) or (3) of this section, it shall ensure that the sign indicates, in conformity with the state traffic control manual, that increased traffic penalties are in effect within the wildlife crossing zone. For the purposes of this section, it shall be sufficient that the sign states "increased penalties in effect".

In establishing a lower speed limit within a wildlife crossing zone, the department of transportation shall give due consideration to factors including, but not limited to, the following:

The percentage of traffic accidents that occur within the area that involve the presence of wildlife on the public highway;

The relative levels of traffic congestion and mobility in the area; and

The relative numbers of traffic accidents that occur within the area during the daytime and evening hours and involve the presence of wildlife on the public highway.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "wildlife" shall have the same meaning as "big game" as set forth in section 33-1-102 (2), C.R.S.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the department of transportation shall not establish any area of any interstate highway as a wildlife crossing zone.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1238), ch. 393, p. 1866, § 1, effective September 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (7)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (7), effective March 2, 2012. (See

L. 2010, p. 1866

.)